Utah statutes.
76-10-1004.   Sales in containers bearing registered trademark of
substituted articles.
Every person who has or uses any container or similar article bearing or
having in any way connected with it the registered trademark of another for
the purpose of disposing, with intent to deceive or defraud, of any article or
substance other than that which the container or similar article originally
contained or was connected with by the owner of such trademark is guilty of a
class B misdemeanor.
